South Dakota, session 2026, HB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
For purposes of this title, "nonagricultural property" means property classified
under subdivisions 10-6-110(2) and (3).
Section 2. That § 10-6-110 be AMENDED:
10-6-110. For the purposes of taxation, all property is hereby classified into the
following classes:
(1) Agricultural property;
(2) Nonagricultural Commercial-investor nonagricultural property; and
(3) Commercial-operator nonagricultural property; and
(4) Owner-occupied single-family dwellings.
Agricultural property includes any land classified as agricultural land pursuant to
§ 10-6-112 and any improvements on the agricultural land used exclusively for
agricultural purposes. However, agricultural Agricultural property does not include any
normally an occupied dwelling or, automobile garage, or portion of a building used for that
purpose by the occupant of such the dwelling.
Owner-occupied single-family dwellings include all property classified pursuant to
§ 10-13-39.
Nonagricultural property includes all other property not otherwise classified as
agricultural property or owner-occupied single-family dwellings, and further classified
under section 4 of this Act.
The director, in listing and assessing all property to which this section applies, shall
designate opposite each description the class to which the property belongs.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.543.32 2 1218
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
Terms used in sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this Act, mean:
(1) "Ownership holder," an individual holding title, a revocable living trust in which the
grantor is the current beneficiary, or an entity beneficially owned entirely by an
individual;
(2) "Family business," a commercial property, except residential property, where the
ownership holder or the qualified spouse materially participated for at least ten
years, provided the term does not extend to a commercial property after the
termination of the natural life of the ownership holder and, if applicable, the
qualified spouse;
(3) "Material participation," involvement in the day-to-day management and
operations contributing to the commercial activity of a property on a regular,
continuous, and substantial basis, as described in 26 U.S.C § 469(h) (March 11,
2021) and 26 C.F.R § 1.469-5T (April 1, 1996);
(4) "Qualified entity," a partnership, joint venture, limited liability company, or
corporation owned more than fifty percent by the ownership holder or a qualified
relative of the ownership holder, where the owners of at least forty percent of the
beneficial interest of the limited liability company or corporation materially
participate;
(5) "Qualified relative," a spouse, child, step-child, parent, grandparent, sibling, uncle,
aunt, niece, or nephew of the ownership holder; and
(6) "Qualified spouse," a spouse, or an unremarried widow, of the ownership holder or
of a qualified relative.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
For purposes of classifying property for taxation, the following property is classified
as commercial-operator nonagricultural property:
(1) A family business; and
(2) Nonagricultural property, except residential property, where the ownership holder,
qualified entity, qualified spouse, or qualified relative materially participates.
Nonagricultural property that is not classified as commercial-operator
nonagricultural property is classified as commercial-investor nonagricultural property.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.543.32 3 1218
Prior to August first of each year, an ownership holder may submit to the director
of equalization an application to reclassify property, for the purpose of taxation, as
commercial-operator nonagricultural property. The secretary of the department shall
develop the application form. The ownership holder shall include in the application any
documentary evidence required by the director to verify eligibility for the reclassification.
Within thirty days of receiving a request, the director shall determine whether the
property meets the criteria provided in section 4 of this Act for classification as
commercial-operator nonagricultural property. If the property meets the criteria, the
director must classify the property as commercial-operator nonagricultural property for
the following tax year.
An aggrieved person may appeal the determination of the director pursuant to
chapter 1-26.
It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for an ownership holder to knowingly misrepresent the
facts of the application.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
To renew the classification of property as commercial-operator nonagricultural
property, the ownership holder shall, prior to August first of each year, submit an affidavit
to the director of equalization attesting to the eligibility of the property as commercial-
operator nonagricultural property. The secretary of the department shall prescribe forms
for purposes of submitting an affidavit under this section.
If an ownership holder fails to submit an application to renew the classification of
the property prior to the date provided in this section, the director of equalization must
reclassify the property as commercial-investor nonagricultural property for the following
tax year.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-6:
If an application or affidavit submitted pursuant to section 5 or 6 of this Act, is
approved and the director determines that the ownership holder knowingly
misrepresented the facts on the application or affidavit, the county auditor must assess
a penalty on the property equal to two thousand five hundred dollars, for each year in
which the property was wrongly classified as commercial-operator nonagricultural
property.
If an application or affidavit, submitted pursuant to section 5 or 6 of this Act, is
approved and the director determines that the ownership holder negligently
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.543.32 4 1218
misrepresented the facts on the application or affidavit, the county auditor must assess a
penalty on the property equal to five hundred dollars for each year in which the property
was wrongly classified as commercial-operator nonagricultural property.
The county treasurer shall deposit any civil penalty collected under this section in
the county general fund.
Section 8. That § 10-12-42 be AMENDED:
10-12-42. For taxes payable in 2026, and each year thereafter, the levy for the
general fund of a school district is as follows:
(1) The Except as otherwise provided in this section, the maximum tax levy on
nonagricultural property is five dollars and twenty-one and one-tenth cents per
thousand dollars of taxable valuation, subject to the limitations on agricultural
property as provided in subdivision (2) of this section and owner-occupied property
as provided in subdivision (3) of this section;
(2) The maximum tax levy on agricultural property for the school district is one dollar
and twelve and five-tenths cents per thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the
district's levies are less than the maximum levies as stated in this section, the
levies must maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the
mathematical relationship at the maximum levies; and
(3) The maximum tax levy for an owner-occupied single-family dwelling pursuant to
§ 10-13-40 for the school district is two dollars and fifty-one and eight-tenths cents
per thousand dollars of taxable valuation. If the district's levies are less than the
maximum levies as stated in this section, the levies must maintain the same
proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical relationship at the
maximum levies.
For taxes payable in 2028 and each year thereafter, the maximum levy for the
general fund of a school district, for commercial-operator nonagricultural property, must
be at least twenty-five percent lower than the maximum levy for nonagricultural property
provided in subdivision (1) of this section.
All levies in this section must be imposed on valuations where the median level of
assessment represents eighty-five percent of market value as determined by the
Department of Revenue. These valuations must be used for all school funding purposes.
If the district has imposed an excess levy pursuant to § 10-12-43, the levies must
maintain the same proportion to each other as represented in the mathematical
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.543.32 5 1218
relationship at the maximum levies in this section. The school district may elect to tax at
less than the maximum amounts set forth in this section.
Section 9. Section 8 of this Act is effective beginning July 1, 2027.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.